Utah statutes.
53C-2-202.   Endangered and threatened plant species.

The director may make determinations concerning the management, protection, and conservation of plant species officially designated as endangered or threatened under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973, as amended, on trust lands.



Enacted by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

